extensions/1474684_sk-sk-ascii_spellchecking/sk_sk_ascii_spellchecking-2.4.7/dictionaries/sk-SK-ascii.aff
SFX Z Y 165     # vzor zena mnozne cislo
SFX Z   ina         in         ina is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          ina is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           y          a is:nominative is:plural
SFX Z   a           i          [euo]a is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ka          k          [^aeiouyo].oka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ta          t          orta is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   va          v          [^aeiouyo].ova is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   la          l          iela is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          [aeiouryo].a is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          auka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          [i][aeu][^dnl]a is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          yena is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          ie.[^kd]a is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          [aeiouyo][^hzz][^kbe]a is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          r...[^kl]a is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          i[eua].[ayou][bdv]a is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          [aeiouyro].[eiayuol].a is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          ia[tc]ina is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          azda is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          [aeiouyo][^aeiouyo]cina is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          [^so].ola is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          [aeiouyo][hknssvz][artd][auio][dtnb]a is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          ie[hnprsv][cnrt][aie][dnlv]a is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          alanda is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          [ulac][seamu][fptv]ora is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          tvora is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          [aeiouy][^aeiouyp][^iln]ava is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          iemota is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          [ya]straha is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          avlaha is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   a           0          [^e][^g]enda is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ra          er         [uy]hra is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   va          ev         [uy][zz]va is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   aba         ab         laba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ala         al         iala is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   aha         ah         [^aeiouyv][^ir]aha is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ata         at         [^aeiouy].[^is]ata is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ava         av         [^aeiouy][^aeiouyrp][^iln]ava is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ada         ad         [^i][aeiouy].ada is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ada         ad         [iom][bhz]rada is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ada         ad         a[mh][bn]ada is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ica         ic         ivica is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ba          ob         ia.ba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ba          ob         [aeiouyo].ba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ata         iat        sata is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   oba         ob         [^rzeeiayuoo][^j]oba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ota         ot         [^ieiayuoorl][^eiayuoo][^d]ota is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   oda         od         [^eiayuoorl].oda is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   oha         oh         [^aeiouy]loha is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ola         ol         skola is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ola         ol         odola is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ora         or         [hkm]ora is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ora         or         [od]pora is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ka          ok         [^f]i[ea].ka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ka          ok         [aeiouyor][^u]ka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ka          ok         [aieo]jka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ka          ok         [aeiouyor]stka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ka          ok         i[eau]stka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ka          ok         ientka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ka          iek        iantka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ka          ok         adzka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ata         iat        ata is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   aba         iab        zaba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ba          ieb        [^t][rns]ba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ba          ieb        [^i].tba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ba          ieb        [^u][vzz]ba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   eda         ied        [^i]eda is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   eba         ieb        [^i]eba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ra          ier        [hd]ra is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   va          iev        [kstzz]va is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   va          iev        arva is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   lva         liev       lva is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   lba         lieb       [aeo]lba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ilba        ilb        ilba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   dba         dieb       [auo]dba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   dka         diek       [^i][^eioouy]dka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   nka         niek       [^i][^eioouy]nka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   tka         tiek       [^i][^eioouy]tka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   arta        art        arta is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ka          iek        [^i][lr][fdccs]ka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ka          iek        [^i][aeiuy][bccdfghklmoprsstvzz]ka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ka          iek        [^i][aeuiy][sn]tka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ka          iek        o[bccdfghklmnoprsstvzz]ka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ka          iek        [lr]nka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ka          iek        [^i][eiuy]nka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ka          iek        [^ib]anka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   lka         liek       [^i][aeouy]lka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   eta         iet        [^p][^o][^iu]eta is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   alva        alv        alva is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   rva         rv         [bmt]rva is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   rba         rb         trba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   aba         ab         baba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   iba         ib         iba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   uda         ud         uda is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   iha         ih         iha is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ika         ik         [^eiayuoo].ika is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ila         il         [^a]ila is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ita         it         [^i][aeiouy].ita is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ina         in         [^i][aaeiouy].ina is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ina         in         [^i][aoley][bhjlnrtv]cina is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ina         in         [^a][bccdhrkjrnddtvzz][clmnpsrvz]ina is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   elta        ielt       [^i]elta is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ela         iel        [^dilnrtu]ela is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   esta        iest       [^d][^i]esta is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   enda        iend       egenda is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ena         ien        [^mty]ena is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ena         ien        [^eiayuoo]mena is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   ma          iem        [^i]erma is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   anda        and        [^a].anda is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   arda        ard        arda is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   amba        amb        amba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   imba        imb        imba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   omba        omb        [^l]omba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   umba        umb        umba is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   unda        und        unda is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   rnda        rnd        rnda is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   avda        avd        avda is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   azda        azd        azda is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   abzda       abzd       abzda is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   azda        azd        azda is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   auna        aun        auna is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   uka         uk         [^eiayuoo][^a]uka is:genitive is:plural
SFX Z   una         un         [dklr]una is:genitive is:plural
