extensions/1474684_sk-sk-ascii_spellchecking/sk_sk_ascii_spellchecking-2.4.7/dictionaries/sk-SK-ascii.dic
Beata/zZ po:noun is:feminine
Daska/zZ po:noun is:feminine
Freetowncanka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
Havana/zZ po:noun is:feminine
Karina/zZ po:noun is:feminine
Lusacanka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
Mongolka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
Precincanka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
Stanislava/zZ po:noun is:feminine
Vesna/zZ po:noun is:feminine
adamitka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
alergicka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
anima/zZ po:noun is:feminine
armatura/zZ po:noun is:feminine
autonomistka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
bambitka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
biblioteka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
bohemistka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
brva/zZ po:noun is:feminine
camrva/zZ po:noun is:feminine
chalupka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
chvastunka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
citacka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
cykloturistika/zZ po:noun is:feminine
demokratka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
dieta/zZ po:noun is:feminine
dochadzka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
dratvicka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
duzina/zZ po:noun is:feminine
elektrodiagnostika/zZ po:noun is:feminine
esperantistka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
fajocka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
fialka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
formalistka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
fuga/zZ po:noun is:feminine
genialita/zZ po:noun is:feminine
grofka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
haspra/zZ po:noun is:feminine
hlozka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
hostitelka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
hukacka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
idyla/zZ po:noun is:feminine
investitura/zZ po:noun is:feminine
jedlovina/zZ po:noun is:feminine
kalinka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
karantena/zZ po:noun is:feminine
kefa/zZ po:noun is:feminine
kmotra/zZ po:noun is:feminine
komorka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
korba/zZ po:noun is:feminine
kozlacina/zZ po:noun is:feminine
krivda/zZ po:noun is:feminine
kuponka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
ladvinka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
ledacina/zZ po:noun is:feminine
lira/zZ po:noun is:feminine
luteranka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
malinka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
marinada/zZ po:noun is:feminine
mayovka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
metlina/zZ po:noun is:feminine
mitra/zZ po:noun is:feminine
morka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
myriada/zZ po:noun is:feminine
nakova/zZ po:noun is:feminine
navnada/zZ po:noun is:feminine
nivea/zZ po:noun is:feminine
obhajovatelka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
odchylka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
olympionicka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
organistka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
otavienka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
panegyrika/zZ po:noun is:feminine
paseracka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
pedikura/zZ po:noun is:feminine
piesenka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
planina/zZ po:noun is:feminine
poberatelka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
podstata/zZ po:noun is:feminine
polizba/zZ po:noun is:feminine
poroba/zZ po:noun is:feminine
povedacka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
preciozka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
prenaska/zZ po:noun is:feminine
prieluka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
producentka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
pseudoveda/zZ po:noun is:feminine
radionka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
reformistka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
rimsa/zZ po:noun is:feminine
roznaska/zZ po:noun is:feminine
ryba/zZ po:noun is:feminine
samolepka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
scitacka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
semioticka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
siedmacka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
skarovacka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
skumavka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
slivovicka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
sobolina/zZ po:noun is:feminine
sparocka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
spolupodnikatelka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
standarda/zZ po:noun is:feminine
stola/zZ po:noun is:feminine
strofa/zZ po:noun is:feminine
subdodavatelka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
susienka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
symbolika/zZ po:noun is:feminine
tarajka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
termodynamika/zZ po:noun is:feminine
toaletka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
trestanka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
tryska/zZ po:noun is:feminine
uhliarka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
utierka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
vcela/zZ po:noun is:feminine
viazanicka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
vizionarka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
vozovka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
vyhoda/zZN po:noun is:feminine
vystava/zZ po:noun is:feminine
zabrana/zZ po:noun is:feminine
zbierka/zZ po:noun is:feminine
znaska/zZ po:noun is:feminine
